Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.530.050

Holder to notify treasurer—Redemption.

Every holder of any of the bonds so issued as a bearer bond as provided in this chapter, within ten days after the owner becomes the owner or holder thereof, shall notify the county treasurer of the county in which such bonds are issued of his or her ownership, together with his or her full name and post office address, and the county treasurer of said county shall deposit in the post office, properly stamped and addressed to each owner of any such bonds subject to redemption or payment, a notice in like form, stating the time and place of the redemption of such bonds and the number of the bonds to be redeemed, and in case any owners of bonds shall fail to notify the treasurer of their ownership as aforesaid, then a notice mailed to the last holder of such bonds shall be deemed sufficient, and any and all such notices so mailed as aforesaid shall be deemed to be personal notice to the holders of such bonds, and at the expiration of the time therein named shall have the force to suspend the interest upon any such bonds.

[ 1990 c 33 s 479; 1983 c 167 s 26; 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.51.190. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 330 s 13; RRS s 4953; prior: 1897 c 118 s 125; 1890 p 49 s 9. Formerly RCW 28A.51.190, 28.51.190.]

NOTES:

Liberal construction—Severability—1983 c 167: See RCW 39.46.010 and note following.